Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1202
Judicial Resources Commission; term; vacancy.

The term of office of each member of the Judicial Resources Commission shall be six years. In the event of a vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original member was appointed, and the individual so appointed shall serve for the balance of the original term. Any member of the commission shall be eligible for reappointment for an additional term without regard to the number of years that such individual has served as a member of the commission.

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1994, § 24-809.02.